Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Chief Medical Examiner and Postmortem Examinations.
§ 32.1-283.2.
Local and regional child fatality review teams established; membership; authority; confidentiality; immunity.

Upon the initiative of any local or regional law-enforcement agency, fire department, department of social services, emergency medical services agency, attorney for the Commonwealth’s office, or community services board, local or regional child fatality teams may be established for the purpose of conducting contemporaneous reviews of local child deaths in order to develop interventions and strategies for prevention specific to the locality or region. Each team shall establish rules and procedures to govern the review process. Agencies may share information but shall be bound by confidentiality and execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information they share. Violations are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor. The State Child Fatality Review Team shall provide technical assistance and direction as provided for in subsection A of §

32.1-283.1

.

Local and regional teams may be composed of the following persons from the localities represented on a particular board or their designees: a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

, a local social services official in charge of child protective services, a director of the relevant local or district health department, a chief law-enforcement officer, a local fire marshal, a local emergency medical services agency chief, the attorney for the Commonwealth, an executive director of the local community services board or other local mental health agency, and such additional persons, not to exceed four, as may be appointed to serve by the chairperson of the local or regional team. The chairperson shall be elected from among the designated membership. The additional members appointed by the chairperson may include, but are not restricted to, representatives of local human services agencies; local public education agencies; local pediatricians, psychiatrists and psychologists; and local child advocacy organizations.

Each team shall establish local rules and procedures to govern the review process prior to conducting the first child fatality review. The review of a death shall be delayed until any criminal investigations connected with the death are completed or the Commonwealth consents to the commencement of such review prior to the completion of the criminal investigation.

All information and records obtained or created regarding the review of a fatality shall be confidential and shall be excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. All such information and records shall be used by the team only in the exercise of its proper purpose and function and shall not be disclosed. Such information or records shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or discovery or be admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, discovery or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the team during a fatality review. No person who participated in the reviews nor any member of the team shall be required to make any statement as to what transpired during the review or what information was collected during the review. Upon the conclusion of the fatality review, all information and records concerning the victim and the family shall be returned to the originating agency or destroyed. However, the findings of the team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form which shall not identify individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual cases are discussed by the team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. All team members, persons attending closed team meetings, and persons presenting information and records on specific fatalities to the team during closed meetings shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during any closed meeting to review a specific death. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Members of teams, as well as their agents and employees, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission made in connection with participation in a child fatality review team review, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Any organization, institution, or person furnishing information, data, testimony, reports or records to review teams as part of such review, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission in furnishing such information, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

1999, c. 867; 2004, c. 690; 2014, c. 583; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2017, c. 778.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “A 54 of §

2.2-3705

” in subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, substituted “attorney for the Commonwealth’s” for “Commonwealth’s Attorney’s” in the first sentence and substituted “are” for “shall be” in the fourth sentence; in the first sentence of subsection B, substituted “medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

” for “local or regional medical examiner”; and in subsection D, substituted “are” for “shall be” near the end.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and in subsection B, inserted “a local emergency medical services agency chief” following “marshal” and substituted “four” for “five” in the first sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection D.

§ 32.1-283.3.
Family violence fatality review teams established; model protocol and data management; membership; authority; confidentiality, etc.

The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall develop a model protocol for the development and implementation of local family violence fatality review teams (teams) and such model protocol shall include relevant procedures for conducting reviews of fatal family violence incidents. A “fatal family violence incident” means any fatality that occurred or that is suspected of having occurred in the context of abuse between family members or intimate partners. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall provide technical assistance to the local teams and serve as a clearinghouse for information.

Subject to available funding, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall provide ongoing surveillance of fatal family violence occurrences and promulgate an annual report based on accumulated data.

Any county or city, or combination of counties, cities, or counties and cities, may establish a family violence fatality review team to examine fatal family violence incidents and to create a body of information to help prevent future family violence fatalities. The team shall have the authority to review the facts and circumstances of all fatal family violence incidents that occur within its designated geographic area.

Membership in the team may include, but shall not be limited to, health care professionals, representatives from the local bar, attorneys for the Commonwealth, judges, law-enforcement officials, criminologists, medical examiners appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

, other experts in forensic medicine and pathology, family violence victim advocates, health department professionals, probation and parole professionals, adult and child protective services professionals, and representatives of family violence local coordinating councils.

Each team shall establish local rules and procedures to govern the review process prior to the first fatal family violence incident review conducted. The review of a death shall be delayed until any criminal investigations or prosecutions connected with the death are completed.

All information and records obtained or created regarding the review of a fatality shall be confidential and shall be excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. All such information and records shall be used by the team only in the exercise of its proper purpose and function and shall not be disclosed. Such information or records shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum or discovery or be admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, discovery or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the team during a fatality review. No person who participated in the review nor any member of the team shall be required to make any statement as to what transpired during the review or what information was collected during the review. Upon the conclusion of the fatality review, all information and records concerning the victim and the family shall be returned to the originating agency or destroyed. However, the findings of the team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form which shall not identify individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual cases are discussed by the team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. All team members, persons attending closed team meetings, and persons presenting information and records on specific fatalities to the team during closed meetings shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during any closed meeting to review a specific death. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Members of teams, as well as their agents and employees, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission made in connection with participation in a family violence fatality review, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Any organization, institution, or person furnishing information, data, testimony, reports or records to review teams as part of such review, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission in furnishing such information, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

1999, cc. 849, 868; 2014, c. 583; 2016, c. 307; 2017, c. 778.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been

32.1-283.2

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsections A and B, inserted “Office of the” throughout the subsections; deleted “hereinafter” preceding “teams” in subsection A, and substituted “and such model protocol” for “which”; in subsection D, substituted “examiners appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

” for “examiner” and made a stylistic change; and in subsection F, substituted “are” for “shall be” near the end.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 307 substituted “that occurred or that is suspected of having occurred in the context of” for “whether homicide or suicide, occurring as a result of” in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection F.

§ 32.1-283.4.
Confidentiality of certain information and records collected and maintained by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

Confidential records and information obtained from private and public entities and provided to the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner during the course of a death investigation shall remain confidential and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Information and records concerning a decedent collected and maintained by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner during the course of surveillance programs or research or studies of deaths having public health importance shall be confidential and may only be published in summary or aggregate form or as authorized by the Chief Medical Examiner.

The confidential records and information set forth in subsections A and B shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or discovery when in the possession of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, or be admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding through any discovery relating to the Office. If available from other sources, however, such records and information shall not be immune from subpoena duces tecum, or discovery when obtained through such other sources solely because the records and information were presented to the Office during a death investigation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the disclosure or publication of the findings of investigations, surveillance programs, research, and studies in aggregate or statistical form from which personal identifiers have been removed.

History.

2005, c. 37; 2007, c. 868.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 868 substituted “aggregate or statistical form” for “aggregate, statistical, or other form” in subsection D.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-283.5.
Adult Fatality Review Team; duties; membership; confidentiality; penalties; report; etc.

There is hereby created the Adult Fatality Review Team, referred to in this section as “the Team,” which shall develop and implement procedures to ensure that adult deaths occurring in the Commonwealth are analyzed in a systematic way. The Team shall review the death of any person age 60 years or older, or any adult age 18 years or older who is incapacitated, who resides in the Commonwealth, or who does not reside in the Commonwealth but who is temporarily in the Commonwealth and who is in need of temporary or emergency protective services (i) who was the subject of an adult protective services or law-enforcement investigation; (ii) whose death was due to abuse, neglect, or exploitation or acts suggesting abuse, neglect, or exploitation; or (iii) whose death came under the jurisdiction of or was investigated by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to §

32.1-283

. The Team shall not initiate an adult death review until the conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or criminal prosecution. The operating procedures for the review of adult deaths shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision B 17 of §

2.2-4002

.

The 16-member team shall consist of the following persons or their designees: the Chief Medical Examiner, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Director of the Office of Licensure and Certification of the Department of Health, and the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. In addition, the Governor shall appoint one representative from each of the following entities: a licensed funeral services provider, the Medical Society of Virginia, and local departments of social services, emergency medical services, attorneys for the Commonwealth, law-enforcement agencies, nurses specializing in geriatric care, psychiatrists specializing in geriatric care, and long-term care providers. The Team further shall include two members appointed by the Governor who are advocates for elderly or disabled populations in Virginia. The Chief Medical Examiner shall serve as chair of the Team.After the initial staggering of terms, members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for a term of four years. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. The Chief Medical Examiner and other ex officio members of the Team shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

Upon the request of the chair of the Team, made after the conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or prosecution, information and records regarding an adult whose death is being reviewed by the Team shall be inspected and copied by the chair or his designee, including but not limited to any report of the circumstances of the event maintained by any state or local law-enforcement agency or the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and information or records on the adult maintained by any facility that provided services to the adult, by any social services agency, or by any court. Information, records, or reports maintained by any attorney for the Commonwealth shall be made available for inspection and copying by the chair or his designee pursuant to procedures that shall be developed by the Chief Medical Examiner and the Commonwealth’s Attorneys’ Services Council established by §

2.2-2617

. In addition, a health care provider shall provide the Team, upon request, with access to the health and mental health records of (i) the adult whose death is subject to review, without authorization; (ii) any adult relative of the deceased, with authorization; and (iii) any minor child of the deceased, with the authorization of the minor’s parent or guardian. The chair of the Team also may copy and inspect the presentence report, prepared pursuant to §

19.2-299

, of any person convicted of a crime that led to the death of the adult who is the subject of review by the Team.

All information obtained or generated by the Team regarding a review shall be confidential and excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. Such information shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the Team during an adult death review. The Team shall compile all information collected during a review. The findings of the Team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form, but shall not identify any individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual adult death cases are discussed by the Team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

.

All Team members and other persons attending closed Team meetings, including any persons presenting information or records on specific fatalities, shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during meetings at which the Team reviews a specific death. No Team member or other person who participates in a review shall be required to make any statement regarding the review or any information collected during the review. Upon conclusion of a review, all information and records concerning the victim and the family shall be shredded or otherwise destroyed in order to ensure confidentiality. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Upon notification of an adult death, any state or local government agency or facility that provided services to the adult or maintained records on the adult or the adult’s family shall retain the records for the longer of 12 months or until such time as the Team has completed its review of the case.

The Team shall compile an annual report by October 1 of each year that shall be made available to the Governor and the General Assembly. The annual report shall include any policy, regulatory, or budgetary recommendations developed by the Team. Any statistical compilations prepared by the Team shall be public record and shall not contain any personally identifying information.

History.

2008, c. 539; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, c. 583; 2015, c. 108; 2017, c. 778.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 539, cl. 2 provides: “That the initial appointments of members, other than the Chief Medical Examiner, the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the Commissioner of the Virginia Department for the Aging, the Director of Adult Service/Adult Protective Services of the Virginia Department of Social Services, the Director of the Office of Licensure and Certification of the Department of Health, and the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, who shall serve terms coincident with their respective terms in office, shall be staggered as follows: five of the members appointed by the Governor for a term of two years and six for a term of four years.”

Acts 2008, c. 539, cl. 3 provides: “That in developing its protocol and procedures, the Team shall review and consider the recommendations contained in House Document No. 30 (2004) issued by the Department of Social Services entitled ‘Virginia Adult Fatality Review Team: Preventing Fatal Abuse and Neglect of Virginia’s Vulnerable Adults.’ ”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” near the beginning of subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “any person age 60 years or older, or any adult age 18 years or older who is incapacitated, who resides in the Commonwealth or who does not reside in the Commonwealth but who is temporarily in the Commonwealth and who is in need of temporary or emergency protective services” for “any adult, as defined in §

63.2-1603

”; and in the first sentence of subsection B, substituted “16-member team” for “17-member team” and “the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “the Commissioner of the Virginia Department for the Aging; the Director of Adult/Services/Adult Protective Services of the Department of Social Services.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, substituted “referred to in this section” for “hereinafter referred to”; in the second paragraph of subsection B, inserted “and other ex officio members of the Team” and substituted “their terms of” for “his term in”; in subsection C, substituted “the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner”; in subsection E, substituted “are” for “shall be” near the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 108 in subsection A, inserted “or law-enforcement” in clause (i), twice inserted “or exploitation” in clause (ii) and added the last sentence; added the last sentence in subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection D.

§ 32.1-283.6.
Local and regional adult fatality review teams established; membership; authority; confidentiality; immunity.

Upon the initiative of any local or regional law-enforcement agency, department of social services, emergency medical services agency, attorney for the Commonwealth’s office, community services board, or official with the Adult Protective Services Unit established pursuant to §

51.5-148

, local or regional adult fatality review teams may be established for the purpose of conducting contemporaneous reviews of local adult deaths in order to develop interventions and strategies for prevention specific to the locality or region. For the purposes of this section, the team may review the death of any person age 60 years or older, or any adult age 18 years or older who is incapacitated, who resides in the Commonwealth and who is in need of temporary or emergency protective services (i) who was the subject of an adult protective services or law-enforcement investigation; (ii) whose death was due to abuse, neglect, or exploitation or acts suggesting abuse, neglect, or exploitation; or (iii) whose death came under the jurisdiction of or was investigated by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner as occurring in any suspicious, unusual, or unnatural manner, pursuant to §

32.1-283

. Each team shall establish rules and procedures to govern the review process. Agencies may share information but shall be bound by confidentiality and execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information they share. A violation of this subsection is punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall develop a model protocol for the development and implementation of local or regional adult fatality review teams and such model protocol shall include relevant procedures for conducting reviews of adult fatalities.

Local and regional teams may be composed of the following persons from the localities represented on a particular board or their designees: a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

, a local adult protective services official, a local social services official, a director of the relevant local or district health department, an executive director of the local area agency on aging or other department representing the interests of the elderly or disabled, a chief law-enforcement officer, the attorney for the Commonwealth, an executive director of the local community services board or other local mental health agency, a local judge, and such additional persons as may be appointed to serve by the chair of the local or regional team. The chair shall be elected from among the designated membership. The additional members appointed by the chair may include, but are not restricted to, representatives of local human services agencies, local health care professionals specializing in geriatric care or care of incapacitated adults, local emergency medical services personnel, local long-term care providers, representatives of local advocacy or service organizations for elderly or disabled populations, experts in forensic medicine and pathology, local funeral services providers, local centers for independent living, local long-term care ombudsmen, and representatives of the local bar.

Each local or regional team shall establish operating procedures to govern the review process prior to conducting the first adult fatality review. The review of a death shall be delayed until any criminal investigations connected with the death are completed or the Commonwealth consents to the commencement of such review prior to the completion of the criminal investigation.

All information and records obtained or created regarding a review of a fatality shall be confidential and shall be excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. All such information and records shall be used by the team only in the exercise of its proper purpose and function and shall not be disclosed. Such information and records shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the team during the fatality review. No person who participated in the review and no member of the team shall be required to make any statement as to what transpired during the review or what information was collected during the review. Upon the conclusion of the fatality review, all information and records concerning the victim and family shall be returned to the originating agency or destroyed. However, the findings of the team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form that does not identify any individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual cases are discussed by the team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. All team members, persons attending closed team meetings, and persons presenting information and records on specific fatalities to the team during closed meetings shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during any closed meeting to review a specific death. A violation of this subsection is punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Members of teams, as well as their agents and employees, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission made in connection with participation in an adult fatality review team review, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Any organization, institution, or person furnishing information, data, testimony, reports, or records to review teams as part of such review shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission in furnishing such information, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2015, c. 108; 2017, c. 778.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection D.

§ 32.1-283.7.
Local and regional overdose fatality review teams established; membership; authority; confidentiality; immunity.

Any county or city, or combination of counties, cities, or counties and cities, may establish a local or regional overdose fatality review team for the purpose of (i) conducting contemporaneous reviews of local overdose deaths, (ii) promoting cooperation and coordination among agencies involved in investigations of overdose deaths or in providing services to surviving family members, (iii) developing an understanding of the causes and incidence of overdose deaths in the locality, (iv) developing plans for and recommending changes within the agencies represented on the local team to prevent overdose deaths, and (v) advising the Department and other relevant state agencies on changes to law, policy, or practice to prevent overdose deaths.

A local or regional team may review the death of any person who resides in the Commonwealth and whose death was or is suspected to be due to overdose. Each team shall establish rules and procedures to govern the review process. Agencies may share information but shall be bound by confidentiality and execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information they share. A violation of this subsection is punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner may develop a model protocol for the development and implementation of local or regional overdose fatality review teams, and such model protocol may include relevant procedures for conducting reviews of overdose fatalities.

Local and regional teams may be composed of the following persons from the localities represented on a particular board or their designees: a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

, a local social services official, a director of the relevant local or district health department, a chief law-enforcement officer, an attorney for the Commonwealth, an executive director of the local community services board or other local mental health agency, a local judge, the local school division superintendent, a representative of a local jail or detention center, and such additional persons as may be appointed to serve by the chair of the local or regional team. The chair shall be elected from among the designated membership. The additional members appointed by the chair may include representatives of local human services agencies, local health care professionals who specialize in the prevention and treatment of substance abuse disorders, local emergency medical services personnel, a representative of a hospital, experts in forensic medicine and pathology, local funeral services providers, and representatives of the local bar.

Each local or regional team shall establish operating procedures to govern the review process prior to conducting the first overdose fatality review. The review of a death shall be delayed until any criminal investigations connected with the death are completed or the Commonwealth consents to the commencement of such review prior to the completion of the criminal investigation.

All information and records obtained or created regarding a review of a fatality shall be confidential and shall be excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. All such information and records shall be used by the team only in the exercise of its proper purpose and function and shall not be disclosed. Such information and records shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the team during the fatality review. No person who participated in the review and no member of the team shall be required to make any statement as to what transpired during the review or what information was collected during the review. Upon the conclusion of the fatality review, all information and records concerning the victim and family shall be returned to the originating agency or destroyed. However, the findings of the team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form that does not identify any individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual cases are discussed by the team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. All team members, persons attending closed team meetings, and persons presenting information and records on specific fatalities to the team during closed meetings shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during any closed meeting to review a specific death. A violation of this subsection is punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Members of teams, as well as their agents and employees, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission made in connection with participation in an overdose fatality review team review, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Any organization, institution, or person furnishing information, data, testimony, reports, or records to overdose fatality review teams as part of such review shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission in furnishing such information, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2018, c. 600.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.